South Dakota, session 2026, HB1070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-37-2.2 be AMENDED:
34-37-2.2. In addition to any license required under § 34-37-2, for any sales to
out-of-state residents, a retailer licensee may obtain:
(1) An early season license to operate from May first to June twenty-sixth, with a
required fee of one thousand dollars; or
(2) A late season license to operate from July sixth to August thirty-first, and from
December twenty-eighth to January first, with a required fee of one thousand dollars.
A retailer licensee with a license issued under this section that is located west of
the Missouri River shall provide any consumer with a copy of any law that prohibits the
use of fireworks and a map of the Black Hills Forest Fire Protection District with any sale
of fireworks, other than any sale occurring from June twenty-seventh to July fifth. A
violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanorIn addition to a license required under
§ 34-37-2, a retailer must obtain:
(1) An early season license, if the retailer offers fireworks for sale from May first
through June twenty-sixth; and
(2) A late season license, if the retailer offers fireworks for sale from July sixth through
August thirty-first.
An application for a license pursuant to this section must be made to the
Department of Public Safety on forms prescribed by the department and must be
accompanied by a fee of one thousand dollars for each license.
For every sale of fireworks that occurs outside of the dates of June twenty-seventh
through July fifth, a retailer located west of the Missouri River must provide the customer
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.504.12 2 1070
with a copy of any law that prohibits the use of fireworks, and a map of the Black Hills
Forest Fire Protection District.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Section 2. That § 34-37-10 be AMENDED:
34-37-10. A Except as provided in § 34-37-2.2, a person is guilty of a Class 1
misdemeanor if the person offers any fireworks for sale to any other person, at retail,
other than during the period between beginning June twenty-seventh and ending July fifth
or during the period between beginning December twenty-eighth and ending January first.
A person who is issued a license under § 34-37-2.2 may sell fireworks to out-of-
state residents for the periods designated in § 34-37-2.2.
A person who is issued a late season license under § 34-37-2.2 or a retailer license
under § 34-37-2 may sell any fireworks to residents and nonresidents during the period
from December twenty-eighth to January first.
A retail licensee retailer may not make any sale of sell fireworks between the hours
of twelve a.m. and seven a.m midnight and 7:00 a.m.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.